Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Chapter 5 Family Planning and Birth Control

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sexual partner's tort liability to other partner for fraudulent misrepresentation regarding sterility or use of birth control resulting in pregnancy, 2 ALR5th 301.

Parent's child support liability as affected by other parent's fraudulent misrepresentation regarding sterility or use of birth control, or refusal to abort pregnancy, 2 ALR5th 337.

Propriety of prophylactic availability programs, 52 ALR5th 477.

§ 42-5-101.
Provision of information and services; refusal to accept.

The department of health may provide and pay for family planning and birth control information and services including interviews with trained personnel, distribution of literature, referral to a licensed physician for consultation, examination, tests, medical treatment and prescription and to the extent prescribed, the distribution of rhythm charts, drugs, medical preparation, contraceptive devices and similar products, to any person who may benefit from this information and these services. Information and services shall be provided in a language understood by the recipient.

Any medical service shall be performed by a licensed physician.

The right to receive public assistance and social services or any other public benefit shall not be affected by a refusal to accept family planning and birth control services. Each person offered family planning and birth control services shall be advised of this subsection both orally and in writing.

Any person may refuse to accept the duty of offering family planning and birth control services to the extent the duty is contrary to his personal or religious beliefs. The refusal shall not be grounds for:

Any disciplinary action;

Dismissal;

Any departmental transfer;

Any other discrimination in employment;

Suspension from employment; or

Any loss in pay or other benefits.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 32, §§ 1 to 5; W.S. 1957, §§ 35-508 to 35-512; W.S. 1977, §§

35-14-101

to 35-14-105; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 42-5-102.
Statutory interpretation.

Nothing in W.S.

42-5-101

shall be interpreted to:

Interfere with a person’s religious beliefs;

In any way abridge the right to accept or refuse family planning and birth control services;

Impose practices offensive to a person’s moral standards; or

Restrict self-determination in the procreation of children.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 32, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 35-513; W.S. 1977, § 35-14-106; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.